Florida, session 2026, HB6501.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6501-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6501 2026
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. The sum of $1.75 million is appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund to the Department of Highway Safety and
Motor Vehicles for the relief of the Estate of Danielle Maudsley
for damages sustained as a result of the injuries to Danielle
Maudsley and her subsequent death.
Section 3. The Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw
a warrant payable to the Estate of Danielle Maudsley in the sum
of $1.75 million, minus amounts required to satisfy outstanding
Medicaid liens relating to the medical expenses and care of
Danielle Maudsley, upon funds of the Department of Highway
Safety and Motor Vehicles in the State Treasury and to pay the
same out of such funds.
Section 4. The amount paid by the Division of Risk
Management of the Department of Financial Services in accordance
with the statutory limits of liability set forth in s. 768.28,
Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under this act are
intended to provide the sole compensation for all present and
future claims arising out of the factual situation described in
this act which resulted in the death of Danielle Maudsley. The
total amount paid for attorney fees relating to this claim may
not exceed 25 percent of the amount awarded under this act.
Section 5. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6501-00